Utah statutes.
72-2-103.   Limitations on Transportation Fund appropriations to agencies
not a part of the Department of Transportation -- Exceptions.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), the amount appropriated or
transferred from the Transportation Fund each year may not exceed a combined
total of $11,600,000 to:
(a)  the Department of Public Safety;
(b)  the State Tax Commission;
(c)  the Division of Finance; and
(d)  any other state agency that is not a part of the Department of
Transportation.
(2)  The following amounts are exempt from  the appropriation and transfer
limitations of Subsection (1):
(a)  amounts deposited in the Department of Public Safety Restricted Account
created under Section 53-3-106;
(b)  revenue generated by the uninsured motorist identification fee under
Section 41-1a-1218;
(c)  revenue generated by the motor carrier fee under Section 41-1a-1219 or
Section 72-9-706; and
(d)  revenue generated by the Motorcycle Rider Education Program under Section
53-3-905.
